Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 272.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 106. new text end new text begin Electric generation facility; personal property. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 9, clause (a), attached machinery and other personal property that are part of an electric generation facility with more than 40 megawatts and less than 50 megawatts of installed capacity and that meet the requirements of this subdivision are exempt from taxation and payments in lieu of taxation. The facility must: new text end new text begin (1) be designed to utilize natural gas as a primary fuel; new text end new text begin (2) be owned and operated by a municipal power agency as defined in section 453.52, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (3) be located within 1,000 feet of an existing natural gas pipeline; new text end new text begin (4) satisfy a resource deficiency identified in an integrated resource plan filed under section 216B.2422; new text end new text begin (5) be located outside of the metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (6) have received, by resolution, the approval of the governing bodies of the city and county in which the facility is located for the exemption of personal property provided in this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) Construction of the facility must have commenced after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2028. Property eligible for this exemption does not include electric transmission lines and interconnections or gas pipelines and interconnections appurtenant to the property or the facility. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with property taxes payable in 2029. new text end